Tennessee statutes. Title 2 Elections
Part 1 Registration by Election Commissions
2-2-141. Proof of citizenship for registering to vote.

The coordinator of elections shall compare the statewide voter registration database with the department of safety database to ensure non-United States citizens are not registered to vote in this state. The coordinator of elections is authorized to compare the statewide voter registration database with relevant federal and state agencies and county records for the same purpose. If evidence exists that a particular registered voter is not a citizen of the United States, the coordinator of elections shall notify the county election commission where the person registered to vote that the registered voter may not be a citizen of the United States.

After receiving such notice, the county election commission shall send a notice to the registered voter inquiring whether the individual is eligible to be registered to vote. Any registered voter who receives the notice shall, within thirty (30) days of the receipt of such notice, provide proof of citizenship to the county election commission. For purposes of this subsection (b), proof of citizenship includes:

The voter's birth certificate or a legible photocopy of the birth certificate;

A United States passport, or a legible photocopy of the pertinent pages of the passport, identifying the voter and showing the passport number;

The voter's United States naturalization documentation, a legible photocopy of the naturalization documentation, or the number of the voter's certificate of naturalization; except that any person who provides the number of the certificate of naturalization in lieu of the naturalization documentation shall not be deemed to have provided proof of citizenship until the coordinator of elections verifies the number with the United States citizenship and immigration services in the department of homeland security or its successor; or

Any document or method of proof of citizenship established by the federal Immigration Reform and Control Act of 1986, P.L. 99-603, compiled in 8 U.S.C. §§ 1101 et seq.

If the registered voter does not provide proof of citizenship within thirty (30) days of the receipt of the notification, the administrator of elections of the county where the person registered to vote shall purge the voter from the voter registration database.

In the event a person is unable to provide any documentation included in subsection (b) to show proof of citizenship, the person may appeal to the state election commission and submit additional proof of citizenship in person or in writing. The state election commission shall conduct a hearing and make a finding concerning the individual's citizenship status and shall forward a copy of its decision to the administrator of elections of the county where the person resides. The voter registration database shall be changed by the administrator of elections to accurately reflect the decision of the state election commission with respect to such voter.

All documentation provided to show proof of citizenship as well as the department of safety database or relevant federal and state agency and county records shall be confidential and shall not be available for inspection by the public.

Acts 2011, ch. 235, § 1.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.

2-2-142. Training for individuals or organizations who conduct voter registration drives — Submission of voter registration forms — Restrictions regarding applicant’s personal information — Penalties.

For the purposes of this section, the term “voter registration drive” means to collect voter registration applications from another person and submit the collected application to the county or state election commission for the purposes of registering that person to vote, but does not include state or county governmental entities operating in the course and scope of their official duties.

The coordinator of elections shall offer free voluntary training to individuals or organizations who conduct voter registration drives. The training shall, at a minimum, summarize the laws and procedures regarding voter registration. A list of those individuals or organizations who complete the training may be published on the secretary of state's website or published by any other means deemed appropriate by the secretary of state.

No person or organization shall employ or compensate any person, nor shall any person receive any wages or compensation for registering voters based on the number of voters registered. Nothing in this section prohibits a person from being paid on an hourly or salaried basis to register voters.

No person or organization shall establish quotas or a minimum number of completed voter registration forms to be collected by individuals conducting a voter registration drive.

Any person or organization collecting a voter registration form submitted by an applicant during a voter registration drive shall, within fifteen (15) calendar days of receipt of the form, deliver or mail the form to the county election commission in which the applicant resides according to the address on the application or to the state election commission; provided, that if the date of the receipt of the form is within fifteen (15) calendar days of the voter registration deadline, the submitted forms must be delivered or mailed no later than the voter registration deadline. For the purposes of this subsection (e), a form shall be considered mailed on the date of the postmark stamped on the cover in which such document was mailed.

Any person or organization other than a federal, state, or county governmental entity operating in the course and scope of its official duties who conducts a voter registration drive or operates an online voter registration platform is prohibited from copying, photographing, or in any way retaining, electronically or physically, personal identifying information collected on a voter registration application or entered into the online voter registration platform, including name, date and place of birth, residential address, mailing address, email, phone number, and signature for any purpose other than voter participation, voter engagement, or voter turnout unless the person or organization informs the applicant how the applicant's personal information will be used by the person or organization and the applicant expressly consents in writing or electronically. The social security number provided on the voter registration application or entered into the online voter registration platform is confidential and shall not be copied, photographed, or in any way retained, electronically or physically, by any person other than election officials in their official capacity.

The state election commission may impose a maximum civil penalty up to fifty dollars ($50.00) for each violation of subsection (c), (d), (e), or (f).

For any violation or violations, the state election commission shall send, by return mail, receipt requested, an assessment letter to the person or organization in a form sufficient to advise the person or organization of the factual basis of the violation or violations, the total civil penalty, and the date a response to the letter must be filed. Refusal of or failure to timely claim an assessment letter sent by return mail, receipt requested, constitutes acceptance of the assessment letter for purposes of service.

To request a waiver of reduction in or to in any way contest a penalty imposed by the state election commission, a person or organization shall file a petition with the state election commission. Such petition may be considered as commencing a contested case proceeding under the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Any person or organization who provides or publishes erroneous or incorrect information regarding the qualifications to vote, the requirements to register to vote, whether an individual voter is currently registered to vote or eligible to register to vote, voter registration deadlines, or polling dates, times, and locations shall, upon discovery, immediately notify the appropriate county election commission and the coordinator of elections.

The coordinator of elections and the state election commission are authorized to adopt policies or procedures and to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate this section.

Acts 2019, ch. 250, § 1; 2020, ch. 654, § 3.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment rewrote (a), (b), (e), (f) and (g), which read: “(a) A person or organization who has not been designated by the county election commission under §2-2-111 and who conducts a supplemental voter registration drive in which the person or organization attempts to collect voter registration applications of one hundred (100) or more people must comply with the following conditions:“(1) Prior to conducting a voter registration drive, the person or agent of an organization shall:“(A) Provide the coordinator of elections with the name, address, and contact phone number of the person conducting the voter registration drive or the names, addresses, and contact phone numbers of the officers of the organization conducting the voter registration drive;“(B) Provide the names of the county or counties in which the voter registration drives will be held;“(C) Complete training, which is administered by the coordinator of elections, on the laws and procedures governing the voter registration process;“(D) File a sworn statement stating that the person or organization shall obey all state laws and procedures regarding the registration of voters; and“(E) Ensure that individuals, whether volunteer or paid, who conduct voter registration drives for an organization have completed the training administered by the coordinator of elections; and“(2) The person or organization shall deliver or mail completed voter registration forms within ten (10) days of the date of the voter registration drive; provided, that if the date of the voter registration drive is within ten (10) days of the voter registration deadline, the completed forms must be delivered or mailed no later than the voter registration deadline.”;“(b) Any person or organization conducting a voter registration drive is prohibited from copying, photographing, or in any way retaining the voter information and data collected on the voter registration application, unless the applicant consents. However, the social security number provided on the voter registration application is confidential and must not be retained by any person other than election officials in their official capacity.”;“(e) The coordinator of elections may adopt policies or procedures to effectuate the provisions of this section, including, but not limited to, a form on which the required information may be provided and certified by interested parties. The form adopted by the coordinator of elections may be provided electronically. The coordinator of elections shall, at a minimum, offer the training online and shall not charge a fee for the training.”;“(f) Any person who intentionally or knowingly violates any provision of this section commits a Class A misdemeanor and each violation constitutes a separate offense.“(g) This section does not apply to individuals who are not paid to collect voter registration applications or to organizations that are not paid to collect voter registration applications and that use only unpaid volunteers to collect voter registration applications.”; and added (h) and (i).

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 250, § 9. October 1, 2019.

Acts 2020, ch. 654, § 6. April 2, 2020.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.

False or misleading information regarding voting, §2-19-133.

2-2-143. [Repealed.]

Acts 2019, ch. 250, § 2; repealed by Acts 2020, ch. 654, § 2, effective April 2, 2020.

Compiler's Notes. Former §2-2-143, concerning the civil penalty for submission of incomplete voter registration applications, was repealed by Acts 2020, ch. 654, § 2, effective April 2, 2020.